dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
SFX On Y 6
SFX On 0       ო/&x1n        .
SFX On 0       ო/&x0n        .
SFX On 0       ოს/&x0n       .
SFX On 0       ოთ/&x1n       .
SFX On 0       ოთ/&x0n       .
SFX On 0       ონ/&x0n       .
  
SFX ON Y 6
SFX ON 0       ო/&x1N        .
SFX ON 0       ო/&x0N        .
SFX ON 0       ოს/&x0N       .
SFX ON 0       ოთ/&x1N       .
SFX ON 0       ოთ/&x0N       .
SFX ON 0       ონ/&x0N       .
  



SFX TI Y 6
SFX TI 0       ა/&x1I        .
SFX TI 0       ა/&x0I        .
SFX TI 0       ას/&x0I       .
SFX TI 0       ათ/&x1I       .
SFX TI 0       ათ/&x0I       .
SFX TI 0       ან/&x0I       .
  
SFX To Y 6
SFX To 0       ა/&x1o        .
SFX To 0       ა/&x0o        .
SFX To 0       ას/&x0o       .
SFX To 0       ათ/&x1o       .
SFX To 0       ათ/&x0o       .
SFX To 0       ან/&x0o       .
  
SFX TA Y 6
SFX TA 0       ა/&x1A        .
SFX TA 0       ა/&x0A        .
SFX TA 0       ას/&x0A       .
SFX TA 0       ათ/&x1A       .
SFX TA 0       ათ/&x0A       .
SFX TA 0       ან/&x0A       .
  
SFX TC Y 6
SFX TC 0       ა/&x1C        .
SFX TC 0       ა/&x0C        .
SFX TC 0       ას/&x0C       .
SFX TC 0       ათ/&x1C       .
SFX TC 0       ათ/&x0C       .
SFX TC 0       ან/&x0C       .
  
SFX Ta Y 6
SFX Ta 0       ა/&x1a        .
SFX Ta 0       ა/&x0a        .
SFX Ta 0       ას/&x0a       .
SFX Ta 0       ათ/&x1a       .
SFX Ta 0       ათ/&x0a       .
SFX Ta 0       ან/&x0a       .
  
SFX Tc Y 6
SFX Tc 0       ა/&x1c        .
SFX Tc 0       ა/&x0c        .
SFX Tc 0       ას/&x0c       .
SFX Tc 0       ათ/&x1c       .
SFX Tc 0       ათ/&x0c       .
SFX Tc 0       ან/&x0c       .
  
SFX TE Y 6
SFX TE 0       ა/&x1E        .
SFX TE 0       ა/&x0E        .
SFX TE 0       ას/&x0E       .
SFX TE 0       ათ/&x1E       .
SFX TE 0       ათ/&x0E       .
SFX TE 0       ან/&x0E       .
  
SFX TG Y 6
SFX TG 0       ა/&x1G        .
SFX TG 0       ა/&x0G        .
SFX TG 0       ას/&x0G       .
SFX TG 0       ათ/&x1G       .
SFX TG 0       ათ/&x0G       .
SFX TG 0       ან/&x0G       .
  
SFX Te Y 6
SFX Te 0       ა/&x1e        .
SFX Te 0       ა/&x0e        .
SFX Te 0       ას/&x0e       .
SFX Te 0       ათ/&x1e       .
SFX Te 0       ათ/&x0e       .
SFX Te 0       ან/&x0e       .
  
SFX Tg Y 6
SFX Tg 0       ა/&x1g        .
SFX Tg 0       ა/&x0g        .
SFX Tg 0       ას/&x0g       .
SFX Tg 0       ათ/&x1g       .
SFX Tg 0       ათ/&x0g       .
SFX Tg 0       ან/&x0g       .
  
SFX TX Y 6
SFX TX 0       ა/&x1X        .
SFX TX 0       ა/&x0X        .
SFX TX 0       ას/&x0X       .
SFX TX 0       ათ/&x1X       .
SFX TX 0       ათ/&x0X       .
SFX TX 0       ან/&x0X       .
  
SFX Tx Y 6
SFX Tx 0       ა/&x1x        .
SFX Tx 0       ა/&x0x        .
SFX Tx 0       ას/&x0x       .
SFX Tx 0       ათ/&x1x       .
SFX Tx 0       ათ/&x0x       .
SFX Tx 0       ან/&x0x       .
  
SFX TW Y 6
SFX TW 0       ა/&x1W        .
SFX TW 0       ა/&x0W        .
SFX TW 0       ას/&x0W       .
SFX TW 0       ათ/&x1W       .
SFX TW 0       ათ/&x0W       .
SFX TW 0       ან/&x0W       .
  
SFX Tw Y 6
SFX Tw 0       ა/&x1w        .
SFX Tw 0       ა/&x0w        .
SFX Tw 0       ას/&x0w       .
SFX Tw 0       ათ/&x1w       .
SFX Tw 0       ათ/&x0w       .
SFX Tw 0       ან/&x0w       .
  
SFX Tn Y 6
SFX Tn 0       ა/&x1n        .
SFX Tn 0       ა/&x0n        .
SFX Tn 0       ას/&x0n       .
SFX Tn 0       ათ/&x1n       .
SFX Tn 0       ათ/&x0n       .
SFX Tn 0       ან/&x0n       .
  
SFX TN Y 6
SFX TN 0       ა/&x1N        .
SFX TN 0       ა/&x0N        .
SFX TN 0       ას/&x0N       .
SFX TN 0       ათ/&x1N       .
SFX TN 0       ათ/&x0N       .
SFX TN 0       ან/&x0N       .
  



SFX oI Y 6
SFX oI 0       ე/&x1I        .
SFX oI 0       ე/&x0I        .
SFX oI 0       ეს/&x0I       .
SFX oI 0       ეთ/&x1I       .
SFX oI 0       ეთ/&x0I       .
SFX oI 0       ნენ/&x0I      .
  
SFX oo Y 6
SFX oo 0       ე/&x1o        .
SFX oo 0       ე/&x0o        .
SFX oo 0       ეს/&x0o       .
SFX oo 0       ეთ/&x1o       .
SFX oo 0       ეთ/&x0o       .
SFX oo 0       ნენ/&x0o      .
  
SFX oA Y 6
SFX oA 0       ე/&x1A        .
SFX oA 0       ე/&x0A        .
SFX oA 0       ეს/&x0A       .
SFX oA 0       ეთ/&x1A       .
SFX oA 0       ეთ/&x0A       .
SFX oA 0       ნენ/&x0A      .
  
SFX oC Y 6
SFX oC 0       ე/&x1C        .
SFX oC 0       ე/&x0C        .
SFX oC 0       ეს/&x0C       .
SFX oC 0       ეთ/&x1C       .
SFX oC 0       ეთ/&x0C       .
SFX oC 0       ნენ/&x0C      .
  
SFX oa Y 6
SFX oa 0       ე/&x1a        .
SFX oa 0       ე/&x0a        .
SFX oa 0       ეს/&x0a       .
SFX oa 0       ეთ/&x1a       .
SFX oa 0       ეთ/&x0a       .
SFX oa 0       ნენ/&x0a      .
  
SFX oc Y 6
SFX oc 0       ე/&x1c        .
SFX oc 0       ე/&x0c        .
SFX oc 0       ეს/&x0c       .
SFX oc 0       ეთ/&x1c       .
SFX oc 0       ეთ/&x0c       .
SFX oc 0       ნენ/&x0c      .
  
SFX oE Y 6
SFX oE 0       ე/&x1E        .
SFX oE 0       ე/&x0E        .
SFX oE 0       ეს/&x0E       .
SFX oE 0       ეთ/&x1E       .
SFX oE 0       ეთ/&x0E       .
SFX oE 0       ნენ/&x0E      .
  
SFX oG Y 6
SFX oG 0       ე/&x1G        .
SFX oG 0       ე/&x0G        .
SFX oG 0       ეს/&x0G       .
SFX oG 0       ეთ/&x1G       .
SFX oG 0       ეთ/&x0G       .
SFX oG 0       ნენ/&x0G      .
  
SFX oe Y 6
SFX oe 0       ე/&x1e        .
SFX oe 0       ე/&x0e        .
SFX oe 0       ეს/&x0e       .
SFX oe 0       ეთ/&x1e       .
SFX oe 0       ეთ/&x0e       .
SFX oe 0       ნენ/&x0e      .
  
SFX og Y 6
SFX og 0       ე/&x1g        .
SFX og 0       ე/&x0g        .
SFX og 0       ეს/&x0g       .
SFX og 0       ეთ/&x1g       .
SFX og 0       ეთ/&x0g       .
SFX og 0       ნენ/&x0g      .
  
SFX oX Y 6
SFX oX 0       ე/&x1X        .
SFX oX 0       ე/&x0X        .
SFX oX 0       ეს/&x0X       .
SFX oX 0       ეთ/&x1X       .
SFX oX 0       ეთ/&x0X       .
SFX oX 0       ნენ/&x0X      .
  
SFX ox Y 6
SFX ox 0       ე/&x1x        .
SFX ox 0       ე/&x0x        .
SFX ox 0       ეს/&x0x       .
SFX ox 0       ეთ/&x1x       .
SFX ox 0       ეთ/&x0x       .
SFX ox 0       ნენ/&x0x      .
  
SFX oW Y 6
SFX oW 0       ე/&x1W        .
SFX oW 0       ე/&x0W        .
SFX oW 0       ეს/&x0W       .
SFX oW 0       ეთ/&x1W       .
SFX oW 0       ეთ/&x0W       .
SFX oW 0       ნენ/&x0W      .
  
SFX ow Y 6
SFX ow 0       ე/&x1w        .
SFX ow 0       ე/&x0w        .
SFX ow 0       ეს/&x0w       .
SFX ow 0       ეთ/&x1w       .
SFX ow 0       ეთ/&x0w       .
SFX ow 0       ნენ/&x0w      .
  
SFX on Y 6
SFX on 0       ე/&x1n        .
SFX on 0       ე/&x0n        .
SFX on 0       ეს/&x0n       .
SFX on 0       ეთ/&x1n       .
SFX on 0       ეთ/&x0n       .
SFX on 0       ნენ/&x0n      .
  
SFX oN Y 6
SFX oN 0       ე/&x1N        .
SFX oN 0       ე/&x0N        .
SFX oN 0       ეს/&x0N       .
SFX oN 0       ეთ/&x1N       .
SFX oN 0       ეთ/&x0N       .
SFX oN 0       ნენ/&x0N      .
  

# vim: set ts=8 et:

# Rules for unidentified words.

PFX x3 Y 1
PFX x3   0       ა       .

PFX x2 Y 1
PFX x2   0       მი      .

PFX x1 Y 1
PFX x1   0       და      .

PFX x0 Y 1
PFX x0   0       გა      .

SFX x9 Y 1
SFX x9   0       ა			.

SFX x8 Y 2
SFX x8   ი       ს              ი  
SFX x8   0       ს              [^ი]

SFX x7 Y 4
SFX x7   0       ს              	[იოუ]  
SFX x7   ა       ის              ა  
SFX x7   ე       ის              ე  
SFX x7   0       ის              [^აეიოუ]

SFX x6 Y 3
SFX x6   ი       ებს             ი
SFX x6   ა       ებს             ა
SFX x6   0       ებს             [^აი]

SFX x5 Y 3
SFX x5   ი       ები             ი
SFX x5   ა       ები             ა
SFX x5   0       ები             [^აი]

SFX x4 Y 3
SFX x4   ი       ების            ი
SFX x4   ა       ების            ა
SFX x4   0       ების            [^აი]

# vim: set ts=8 et:
