dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აარ/ON&v
აარს/On&v
აბრკოლ/On&v
აგროვ/OEOnAEaEkE&v
აგრძნობინ/ON&v
ადასტურ/OnAnankn&v
ადგ/oIon&v
ადგინ/OEOnAEaEkEAnankn&v
ადიდ/OGON&v
ადღეგრძელ/ON&v
ავარჯიშ/ON&v
ავნ/ON&v
აზ/ON
აზუსტ/On&v
ათქმევინ/ONANaNkN&v
აიძულ/ON&v
აკავშირ/On&v
აკლ/On&v
აკმაყოფილ/On&v
აკოც/ONANaNkN&v
ალაგ/OnAnankn
ალევინ/On&v
ალი/NSNNTNAEaEkE
ალობ/TN&v
ამაგრ/On&v
ამატ/On&v
ამკობდ/oN&v
ამოძრა/ON&v
ამსხვრი/On&v
ამტკიც/OnONAnankn&v
ამღერ/ON&v
ამხილ/OGON&v
ამჯობინ/ON&v
ანახ/On&v
ანგრი/On&v
ანებ/OGOnAnankn&v
ანინ/TN&v
არ/TN
არეგულირ/ON&v
არღვი/OGOn&v
არწმუნ/On&v
ასახელ/OnON&v
ასიამოვნ/ON&v
ასკვნ/Tn&v
ასწრ/OIOoOn&v
ატკინ/ON&v
აფას/OEOnAEaEkE&v
აღიარ/ONANaNkN&v
აშ/TN
აშენებდ/oN&v
აშინ/On&v
აშლი/TN&v
აჩვენ/ONANaNkN&v
აჩუენ/ON&v
აჩქარ/On&v
აცინ/ON&v
აცხოვნ/ON&v
აძლი/ON&v
აწამ/ON&v
აწყდ/oI&v
აწყენინ/ON&v
აწყვილ/On&v
აჭამ/ONANaNkN&v
აჭირ/On&v
ახალ/ON
ახარისხ/On&v
ახასიათ/OnAnankn&v
აჯ/TN&v
აჯგუფ/On&v
აჯობ/ONANaNkN&v
გალობდ/oN&v
გეგმ/On&v
დვ/Tn&v
დიოდ/oEog&v
ეახლ/ON&v
ეგდ/ON&v
ეგონ/ON&v
ევნ/ON&v
ელოდ/OnON&v
ემთხვი/ON&v
ემყარებოდ/oN&v
ენთ/ON&v
ეპყრ/OoTo&v
ერთდ/oE
ერკვ/oG&v
ერწყ/TE&v
ერჭ/On&v
ესაუბრ/OGON&v
ესწრ/On&v
ესხ/Tn&v
ეფხი/TN&v
ექც/oooG&v
ექცეოდ/oN&v
ეყ/ON&v
ეყრდნ/On&v
ეყრდნობოდ/oN&v
ეჩვენ/ON&v
ეცად/OEON&v
ეძი/ON&v
ეწვალ/ON&v
ეწი/On&v
ეხლ/ON&v
ეჯახ/On&v
ზიდ/ON&v
ზოგ/On
თავისუფლდ/oG&v
თანამშრომლობდ/oN&v
თმ/On
თქუ/TN
ი/TATNANaNkN&v
იაზროვნ/ON&v
იამაყ/ON&v
იარსებ/ON&v
იბრუნ/On&v
იგერიებდ/oN&v
იგრძნ/OEON&v
იგულისხმ/ON&v
იდგ/oN&v
ივარგ/ON&v
ივაჭრ/ON&v
ივახშმ/ONANaNkN&v
ივიწყ/OnAnankn&v
ივნ/ON
იზეპირ/On&v
იზრუნ/ONANaNkN&v
ითვლებოდ/oN&v
ითხო/ON&v
იკ/ONTN
იკამათ/ON&v
იკისრ/ONANaNkN&v
იკლ/To&v
იკმარ/ON&v
იკმაყოფილ/On&v
ილ/TN
ილოც/ON&v
იმარხ/Onon&v
იმარჯვ/OGON&v
იმახსოვრ/On&v
იმსჯელ/ON&v
იმუშავ/ONAEaEkEANaNkN&v
ინატრ/ON&v
ინდ/OnAnankn
ინებ/ONANaNkN&v
იოკ/On&v
იოლ/TN
იომ/ON&v
იპო/ON&v
ისადგურ/On&v
ისადილ/ONANaNkN&v
ისარგებლ/ONANaNkN&v
ისაუბრ/ONANaNkN&v
ისახ/On&v
ისუნთქ/ON&v
ისწრაფოდ/oI&v
იტ/ON
იტვირთ/ON&v
იტირ/OgONANaNkN&v
იქად/ON&v
იქირა/On&v
იქირავ/OnANaNkN&v
იქმნ/TNoN
იქმნებოდ/oN
იქნ/TETN&v
იქონი/ON&v
იქორწინ/ON&v
იქც/oooGoXoWoN&v
იღვარ/On&v
იღონ/ON&v
იყ/OGON&v
იყვ/oN
იყოლი/On&v
იყოფოდ/oN&v
იშვ/TN&v
იშრომ/ONANaNkN&v
იჩივლ/ONANaNkN&v
იჩქარ/ON&v
იცად/OoONAGaGkG&v
იცეკვ/ON&v
იცი/NSNNTN
იცოცხლ/ONANaNkN&v
იძინ/OEOnoEAnankn&v
იწამ/ONANaNkN&v
იწანწალ/ON&v
იწინასწარმეტყველ/ON&v
იწუნ/On&v
იჭიდა/ON&v
იჭრ/TG&v
იხელმძღვანელ/ON&v
იხეტიალ/ON&v
იხი/On&v
იხილ/ONoN&v
იხმარ/ONANaNkN
იხოც/On&v
იხსნ/ToTATnTN&v
იხსომ/On&v
იხურ/OnAnankn&v
კარგ/OnAnankn
კარგავდ/oN&v
კლ/ToTn
კოტრდ/oG&v
კრ/TE
კრიბ/OEoE&v
ლეწ/On&v
მარხ/OnAnankn&v
მაღლდ/oA&v
მკვიდრდ/on&v
ოტ/ON&v
პოვ/ON&v
რი/NPNSNNOn
რიტ/TN&v
საჯ/OnONANaNkN
სდვ/Tn&v
სი/NPNSNNTA
სტყუ/On&v
სცოდ/ON&v
სჭამ/PNON
სხდ/oCoE&v
ტვირთ/On&v
ტოვ/OnAnankn&v
უბრძან/ONANaNkN&v
უგზავნიდ/oN&v
უერთდ/oE&v
უთხრ/TN&v
უკავშირ/On&v
უკარგ/On&v
უკრ/TETn
უმალ/On
უმორჩილ/On&v
უმტკიც/On&v
ურჩ/oX
უსმინ/OoON&v
უსწორდ/oG&v
უსხდ/oI&v
უტყდ/og&v
უქმნ/TE&v
უღალატ/ONANaNkN&v
უყ/ON&v
უყურ/ONANaNkN&v
უშავ/OnAnankn&v
უჩივლ/ON&v
უცად/ON&v
უცვალ/ON&v
უცქირ/ON&v
უძღვ/oG&v
უძღვნ/TI&v
უწოდ/ON&v
უჭერდ/oN&v
უჭირ/OnAnankn&v
უხელმძღვანელ/ON&v
უხსნ/TA&v
ფარ/On
ფშვნ/Tn&v
ქნ/TETN
ქრ/oG
ღალ/On
ღელავდ/oN&v
ღუპ/OnAnankn&v
ყ/OGOgOnON&v
ყვ/oIoooaoG
ყოვნ/ON&v
ცდებოდ/oN&v
ცვალ/OEOGONAEaEkEAGaGkG&v
ცნ/ONTN&v
ცნობდ/oN&v
ცხონდ/oN&v
ძლი/NPOnAnanknANaNkN&v
ძრ/TETn
ძღ/oG
ძღებოდ/oN&v
წამ/ONANaNkN
წყდ/oG&v
ხარჯ/On
ხატავდ/og&v
ხდებოდ/oN&v
ხელმძღვანელობდ/oN&v
ხოც/OnONAnankn&v
ხურ/OnAnankn&v
ჰკითხ/ONANaNkN&v
ჰკლ/To&v
ჰკრ/TN&v
ჰრქუ/TN&v
ჰყვ/oI&v
ჰხად/ON&v
